Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-105, as

last amended by Section 38, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.

2025, Section 6-105), is amended to read as follows:

Section 6-105. A. Unless a legal custodial parent or legal

guardian has filed an objection to licensure pursuant to Section 6-

103.1 of this title, any person under eighteen (18) years of age may

be permitted to operate:

1. A Class D motor vehicle under the graduated driver license

provisions prescribed in subsections B through E of this section;



Req. No. 3106 Page 1

2. A motorcycle under the provisions prescribed in subsection H

of this section; or

3. A farm vehicle under the provisions prescribed in subsection

I of this section.

B. Any person who is at least fifteen (15) years of age may

drive during a session in which the driver is being instructed in a

driver education course, as set out in subparagraphs a, b, c, d and

e of paragraph 1 of subsection C of this section, by a certified

driver education instructor who is seated in the right front seat of

the motor vehicle.

C. Any person:

1. Who is at least fifteen and one-half (15 1/2) years of age

and is currently receiving instruction in or has successfully

completed driver education. For purposes of this section, the term

“driver education” shall mean:

a. a prescribed secondary school driver education course,

as provided for in Sections 19-113 through 19-121 of

Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,

b. a driver education course, certified by Service

Oklahoma, from a parochial, private, or other

nonpublic secondary school,

c. a commercial driver training course, as defined by

Sections 801 through 808 of this title,



Req. No. 3106 Page 2

d. a parent-taught driver education course, certified by

Service Oklahoma, in conjunction with the Department

of Public Safety. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate

rules for any parent-taught driver education course,

or

e. a driver education course certified by a state other

than Oklahoma; or

2. Who is at least sixteen (16) years of age,

may, upon successfully passing all parts of the driver license

examination administered by Service Oklahoma, or an approved written

examination proctor, except the driving examination, be issued a

learner permit which will grant the permittee the privilege to

operate a Class D motor vehicle upon the public highways only

between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m. and while accompanied

by a licensed driver who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age

and who is actually occupying a seat beside the permittee; provided,

the written examination for a learner permit may be waived by

Service Oklahoma upon verification that the person has successfully

completed driver education.

D. 1. Any person:

a. who has applied for, been issued, and has possessed a

learner permit for a minimum of one hundred eighty

(180) days,



Req. No. 3106 Page 3

b. whose custodial legal parent or legal guardian

certifies to Service Oklahoma by sworn affidavit that

the person has received a minimum of fifty (50) hours

of actual behind-the-wheel training, of which at least

ten (10) hours of such training was at night, from a

licensed driver who was at least twenty-one (21) years

of age and who was properly licensed to operate a

Class D motor vehicle for a minimum of two (2) years,

and

c. who has completed a free course approved by the

Oklahoma Department of Transportation on teen driver

work zone and first responder safety,

may be issued an intermediate Class D license upon successfully

passing all parts of the driver license examinations administered by

Service Oklahoma; provided, the written examination, if it has not

previously been administered or waived, may be waived by Service

Oklahoma upon verification that the person has successfully

completed driver education or the driving examination may be waived

by Service Oklahoma upon successful passage of the examination

administered by a certified designated examiner, as provided for in

Section 6-110 of this title. However, notwithstanding the date of

issuance of the learner permit, if the person has been convicted of

a traffic offense which is reported on the driving record of that

person, the time period specified in subparagraph a of this

Req. No. 3106 Page 4

para graph shall be recalculated to begin from the date of conviction

for the traffic offense, and must shall elapse before that person

may be issued an intermediate Class D license. If the person has

been convicted of more than one traffic offense which is reported on

the driving record of that person, the time period specified in

subparagraph a of this paragraph shall be recalculated to begin from

the most recent date of conviction, and must shall elapse before

that person may be issued an intermediate Class D license.

2. A person who has been issued an intermediate Class D license

under the provisions of this subsection:

a. shall be granted the privilege to operate a Class D

motor vehicle upon the public highways:

(1) only between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and 10:00

p.m., except for driving to and from work,

school, school activities, and church activities,

or

(2) at any time, if a licensed driver who is at least

twenty-one (21) years of age is actually

occupying a seat beside the intermediate Class D

licensee, or if the intermediate Class D licensee

is a farm or ranch resident, and is operating a

motor vehicle while engaged in farming or

ranching operations outside the limits of a

municipality, or driving to and from work,

Req. No. 3106 Page 5

school, school activities, or church activities,

and

b. shall not operate a motor vehicle with more than one

passenger unless:

(1) all passengers live in the same household as the

custodial legal parent or legal guardian, or

(2) a licensed driver at least twenty-one (21) years

of age is actually occupying a seat beside the

intermediate Class D licensee.

E. Any person who has been issued an intermediate Class D

license for a minimum of:

1. One (1) year; or

2. One hundred eighty (180) days, if the person has completed

both the driver education and the parent-certified behind-the-wheel

training provisions of subparagraph b of paragraph 1 of subsection D

of this section,

may be issued a Class D license. However, notwithstanding the date

of issuance of the Class D license, if the person has been convicted

of a traffic offense which is reported on the driving record of that

person, the time periods specified in paragraph 1 or 2 of this

subsection, as applicable, shall be recalculated to begin from the

date of conviction for the traffic offense, and must shall elapse

before that person may be issued a Class D license. If the person

has been convicted of more than one traffic offense which is

Req. No. 3106 Page 6

repo rted on the driving record of that person, the time periods

specified in paragraph 1 or 2 of this subsection, as applicable,

shall be recalculated to begin from the most recent date of

conviction, and must shall elapse before that person may be issued a

Class D license.

F. Learner permits and intermediate Class D licenses shall be

issued for the same period as all other driver licenses. The

licenses may be suspended or canceled at the discretion of the

Department of Public Safety, with notice to Service Oklahoma for

violation of restrictions, for failing to give the required or

correct information on the application, for knowingly giving false

or inaccurate information on the application or any subsequent

documentation related to the granting of driving privileges, for

using a hand-held handheld electronic device while operating a motor

vehicle for non-life-threatening emergency purposes or for violation

of any traffic laws of this state pertaining to the operation of a

motor vehicle.

G. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules establishing

procedures for removal of learner permit and intermediate Class D

license restrictions from the permit or license upon the permittee

or licensee qualifying for a less restricted or an unrestricted

license.

H. Any person fourteen (14) years of age or older may apply for

a restricted Class D license with a motorcycle-only restriction.

Req. No. 3106 Page 7

Afte r the person has successfully passed all parts of the motorcycle

examination other than the driving examination, has successfully

completed a certified state-approved motorcycle basic rider course

approved by the Department of Public Safety, in conjunction with

Service Oklahoma, and has met all requirements provided for in the

rules of the Department and Service Oklahoma, Service Oklahoma shall

issue to the person a restricted Class D license with a motorcycle-

only restriction which shall grant to the person, while having the

license in the person’s immediate possession, the privilege to

operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle:

1. With a piston displacement not to exceed three hundred cubic

centimeters (300 cc) or a sixteen and eight-tenths (16.8) kilowatt

electric power source;

2. Between the hours of 4:30 a.m. to 9:00 p.m. only;

3. While wearing approved protective headgear; and

4. While accompanied by and receiving instruction from any

person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age and who is

properly licensed pursuant to the laws of this state to operate a

motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, and who has visual contact with

the restricted licensee.

The restricted licensee may apply on or after thirty (30) days

from date of issuance of the restricted Class D license with a

motorcycle-only restriction to have the restriction of being



Req. No. 3106 Page 8

acco mpanied by a licensed driver removed by successfully completing

the driving portion of an examination.

The written examination and driving examination for a restricted

Class D license with a motorcycle-only endorsement shall be waived

by Service Oklahoma upon verification that the person has

successfully completed a certified state-approved motorcycle basic

rider course approved by the Department and Service Oklahoma.

I. 1. Any person who is less than seventeen (17) years of age

but is at least fourteen (14) years of age, or who is less than

sixteen (16) years of age but is at least fourteen (14) years of age

and is currently receiving instruction in or has completed driver

education as defined in subsection C of this section, and who

resides upon a farm in this state or is employed for compensation

upon a farm in this state may apply to Service Oklahoma for a farm

permit authorizing such person, while possessing the permit, to

operate any Class D motor vehicle.

2. a. A farm permit shall entitle the licensee, who is at

least fourteen (14) years of age but less than sixteen

(16) years of age, to operate the appropriate motor

vehicles at any time:

(1) while going to or from or in connection with any

farm job, employment, or other farm-related work,

(2) on days while school is in session, over the most

direct and accessible route between the

Req. No. 3106 Page 9

licensee’s residence and school of enrollment for

the purpose of school attendance; provided, that

the privilege shall only extend to those

licensees who reside on a farm and commute

directly from their place of residence to the

school in which they are enrolled, or

(3) when the licensee is operating a passenger car at

any time when accompanied by an adult who is the

holder of a valid commercial driver license,

Class A, B, C, or D driver license and who is

actually occupying a seat beside the driver.

b. For a period of six (6) months, a farm permit shall

entitle the licensee who is at least sixteen (16)

years of age to operate the appropriate motor vehicles

at any time:

(1) from 5:00 a.m. to 9:00 p.m.,

(2) while going to or from or in connection with any

farm job, employment, or other farm-related work,

(3) while going to or from authorized school

activities,

(4) while going directly to or from any religious

worship service held by a religious organization,

or



Req. No. 3106 Page 10

(5) while the licensee is operating a passenger car

at any time while accompanied by an adult who is

the holder of a valid commercial driver license,

Class A, B, or C driver license, and who is

actually occupying a seat beside the driver.

After such six-month period, if the licensee has complied with the

provisions of this subsection, such farm permit shall entitle the

licensee to operate the appropriate motor vehicles at any time

without the restrictions required by this subsection.

3. A farm permit shall be issued only if:

a. the applicant can prove that such applicant resides or

works on a farm by submitting the signed affidavit of

either a parent or guardian stating that the applicant

lives on a farm,

b. the applicant has successfully completed the

examination requirements in Section 6-110 of this

title, and

c. the applicant does not live on a farm but works on a

farm and the applicant submits the signed affidavit of

the applicant’s employer and parent or guardian

attesting to such employment.

4. Any licensee issued a farm permit under this subsection:





Req. No. 3106 Page 11

a. who is less than sixteen (16) years of age shall not

operate any motor vehicle with nonsibling minor

passengers,

b. who is at least sixteen (16) years of age, for a

period of six (6) months after reaching sixteen (16)

years of age, shall not operate any motor vehicle with

more than one passenger who is less than eighteen (18)

years of age and who is not a member of the licensee’s

immediate family, or

c. who is at least fourteen (14) years of age, but less

than sixteen (16) years of age, shall not operate any

motor vehicle on interstate or turnpike highway

systems, nor shall a licensee operate a motor vehicle

within the limits of a city with a population in

excess of one hundred thousand (100,000) persons

according to the latest Federal Decennial Census.

Any conviction for violating this paragraph shall be construed as a

moving traffic violation. Service Oklahoma may, in its discretion,

suspend the permit of an individual for violation of this paragraph.

5. Any licensee issued a farm permit under this subsection

shall not operate a wireless communication device while driving a

motor vehicle, except that a licensee may operate a wireless

communication device while driving a motor vehicle to report illegal

activity or to summon medical or other emergency help.

Req. No. 3106 Page 12

6. As used in this subsection, “farm” means any parcel of land

for which the owner has an agricultural exemption permit issued by

the Oklahoma Tax Commission.

7. a. A farm permit issued under this subsection is subject

to suspension or revocation in the same manner as any

other driver license.

b. A farm permit may be suspended in accordance with

Section 6-113 of this title for any violation of

restrictions under this subsection.

c. Service Oklahoma shall suspend the farm permit upon

receiving satisfactory evidence that the licensee has

been involved in two or more accidents chargeable to

the licensee and such suspended license shall not be

reinstated for one (1) year.

8. Any licensee issued a farm permit under this subsection

shall provide, prior to reaching sixteen (16) years of age, a signed

affidavit of either a parent or guardian stating that the applicant

has completed at least fifty (50) hours of adult-supervised driving

with at least ten (10) of those hours being at night. The adult-

supervised driving required by this paragraph shall be conducted by

an adult who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age and is the

holder of a valid commercial driver license, Class A, B, C, or D

driver license. Evidence of failure of any licensee who was

required to complete the fifty (50) hours of adult-supervised

Req. No. 3106 Page 13

driv ing under this subsection shall not be admissible in any action

for the purpose of determining any aspect of comparative negligence

or mitigation of damages.

9. Any licensee issued a farm permit under this subsection who:

a. is under sixteen (16) years of age and is convicted of

two or more moving traffic violations committed on

separate occasions shall not be eligible to receive a

driver license which is not restricted, in accordance

with the provisions of subparagraph a of paragraph 2

of this subsection, until the person reaches seventeen

(17) years of age,

b. is at least sixteen (16) years of age but less than

seventeen (17) years of age and is convicted of two or

more moving traffic violations committed on separate

occasions shall not be eligible to receive a driver

license which is not restricted, in accordance with

the provisions of subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of

this subsection, until the person reaches eighteen

(18) years of age, or

c. fails to provide the affidavit required under

paragraph 8 of this subsection shall not be eligible

to receive a driver license which is not restricted,

in accordance with the provisions of subparagraph a of

paragraph 2 of this subsection, until the person

Req. No. 3106 Page 14

provides such affidavit to Service Oklahoma or the

person reaches seventeen (17) years of age, whichever

occurs first.

J. As used in this section:

1. “Hand-held “Handheld electronic device” means a mobile

telephone or electronic device with which a user engages in a

telephone call, plays or stores media, including but not limited to

music and video, or sends or reads a text message while requiring

the use of at least one hand; and

2. “Using a hand-held handheld electronic device” means

engaging any function on an electronic device.

K. All driver education courses provided for in paragraph 1 of

subsection C of this section shall include education regarding the

dangers of texting while driving and the effects of being under the

influence of alcohol or other intoxicating substance while driving.

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-110, as

last amended by Section 4, Chapter 450, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.

2025, Section 6-110), is amended to read as follows:

Section 6-110. A. 1. Service Oklahoma shall establish

procedures to ensure every applicant for an original Class A, B, C,

or D license and for any endorsements thereon is examined by Service

Oklahoma, or an approved written examination proctor, except as

otherwise provided in Section 6-101 et seq. of this title or as

provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection or in subsections D and E

Req. No. 3106 Page 15

of t his section. Service Oklahoma is authorized to shall authorize,

approve, and enter into agreements with third parties including, but

not limited to, public school districts, technology center districts

overseen by the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology

Education, institutions of higher education, or commercial driver

training schools, to act as approved written examination proctors

with regard to any written examination required by this section.

The examination shall include a test of the applicant’s:

a. eyesight,

b. ability to read and understand highway signs

regulating, warning, and directing traffic,

c. knowledge of the traffic laws of this state including

a portion on bicycle and motorcycle safety, and

d. ability, by actual demonstration, to exercise ordinary

and reasonable control in the operation of a motor

vehicle. The actual demonstration shall be conducted

in the type of motor vehicle for the class of driver

license being applied for.

The Department of Public Safety, in conjunction with Service

Oklahoma, may create a knowledge test that may be taken on the

Internet by an applicant applying for a Class D license.

Any licensee seeking to apply for a driver license of another class

which is not covered by the licensee’s current driver license shall

be considered an applicant for an original license for that class.

Req. No. 3106 Page 16

2. Service Oklahoma shall have the authority to waive the

requirement of any part of the examination required in paragraph 1

of this subsection for those applicants whose driving record meets

the standards set by the Department of Public Safety and surrender

either of the following:

a. a valid unexpired driver license issued by any state

or country for the same type or types of vehicles, or

b. an expired driver license that:

(1) is not expired more than six (6) months past the

expiration date listed on the driver license, and

(2) is not a Class A, B, or C commercial driver

license or commercial driver license permit.

3. Service Oklahoma shall accept skills test results from

another state for Class A, B, or C license applicants who have

successfully completed commercial motor vehicle driver training in

that state and successfully passed the skills test in that state;

provided, Service Oklahoma shall not accept skills test results from

another state when the applicant has not successfully completed

commercial motor vehicle driver training in that state. Nothing in

this section shall be construed to prohibit Service Oklahoma from

administering the skills test to any applicant who has successfully

completed commercial vehicle driver training in another state.

4. All applicants requiring a hazardous materials endorsement

shall be required, for the renewal of the endorsement, to

Req. No. 3106 Page 17

succ essfully complete the examination and to submit to a security

threat assessment performed by the Transportation Security

Administration of the Department of Homeland Security as required by

and pursuant to 49 C.F.R., Part 1572, which shall be used to

determine whether the applicant is eligible for renewal of the

endorsement pursuant to federal law and regulation.

5. Service Oklahoma, or an approved written examination

proctor, shall give the complete examination as provided for in this

section within thirty (30) days from the date the application is

received, and the examination shall be given at a location within

one hundred (100) miles of the residence of the applicant. Service

Oklahoma shall make every effort to make the examination locations

and times convenient for applicants. Service Oklahoma shall

consider giving the examination at any public or private site, if

economically feasible and practicable, and if Service Oklahoma and

the owner or the governing body agree.

B. Any person holding a valid Oklahoma Class D license or

provisional driver license pursuant to Section 6-212 of this title

and applying for a Class A, B or C commercial license shall be

required to successfully complete all examinations as required for

the specified class. Failure to submit to Service Oklahoma

federally required medical certification information pursuant to 49

C.F.R., Part 391.41 et seq. shall result in an automatic downgrade

of a commercial license to a Class D license. Provided, however,

Req. No. 3106 Page 18

once the required medical certification information has been

received by Service Oklahoma, the license shall be reinstated to the

classification of the commercial license prior to the downgrade and

the holder of such a license shall not be required to reapply.

C. Except as provided in subsection E of Section 6-101 of this

title, any person holding a valid Oklahoma Class A, B or C

commercial license shall, upon time for renewal thereof, be entitled

to a Class D license without any type of testing or examination,

except for any endorsements thereon as otherwise provided for by

Section 6-110.1 of this title.

D. 1. Any certified driver education instructor who is

currently an operator or an employee of a commercial driver training

school in this state or any driver education instructor employed by

any school district in this state shall be eligible to apply to be a

designated examiner of Service Oklahoma for the purposes of

administering the Class D driving skills portion of the Oklahoma

driving examination to any person who is eligible to take the

Oklahoma driving examination including, but not limited to, a person

who has been issued a learner permit or farm permit. Service

Oklahoma shall to the maximum extent possible accept electronic

signatures for all applications to be a designated examiner.

2. The Department of Public Safety, in conjunction with Service

Oklahoma, shall adopt a curriculum of required courses and training

to be offered to applicants who are qualified to apply to be a

Req. No. 3106 Page 19

desi gnated examiner. The courses and training for certification

shall meet the same standards as required for driver examiners of

Service Oklahoma. Within thirty (30) days of the effective date of

this act November 1, 2024, and by October 1 of each subsequent year,

Service Oklahoma shall publish a schedule for the subsequent

calendar year of courses and trainings which shall occur no less

than twice per calendar year. Service Oklahoma may schedule

additional courses and trainings based on demand. Service Oklahoma

shall disclose how many slots are available for each course or

training and any restrictions on how those slots may be allocated at

the time of publishing the schedule.

3. Each person applying to be a designated examiner shall be

required to pay an initial designated examiner certification fee of

One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). Upon successful completion of

training prescribed by paragraph 2 of this subsection, the person

shall be required to pay an annual designated examiner certification

fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). If an applicant for the

designated examiner program is employed by an Oklahoma public school

system that offers driver education, and he or she administers the

skills test only to students enrolled in a public school driver

education program, the certification fee may be waived by Service

Oklahoma. Each designated examiner certification shall expire on

the last day of the calendar year and may be renewed upon

application to Service Oklahoma. The designated examiner

Req. No. 3106 Page 20

cert ification fees collected by Service Oklahoma pursuant to this

subsection shall be deposited to the credit of the Department of

Public Safety Restricted Revolving Fund to be used for the purposes

of this subsection, through October 31, 2022. Beginning November 1,

2022, the designated examiner certification fees collected by

Service Oklahoma pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited to

the credit of the Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund. No designated

examiner certification fee shall be refunded in the event that

certification is denied, suspended, or revoked.

4. A designated examiner may charge a fee for each Class D

driving skills examination given, whether the person being examined

passes or fails the examination.

5. Service Oklahoma shall conduct an annual complete nationwide

criminal history background check on each designated examiner and a

complete nationwide criminal history background check on each

designated examiner applicant. The fees for the background check

shall be borne by the designated examiner or designated examiner

applicant.

6. The Department of Public Safety, in conjunction with Service

Oklahoma, shall promulgate rules to implement and administer the

provisions of this subsection.

E. 1. Upon application and approval of Service Oklahoma, any

public or private commercial truck driving school that has or

maintains a program instructing students for a Class A, B or C

Req. No. 3106 Page 21

lice nse, public transit agency, state, county, or municipal

government agency in this state, such as local school districts, the

Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education, or

institutions of higher education, or a private entity, shall be

authorized to hire or employ designated examiners approved by

Service Oklahoma to be third-party examiners of the Class A, B, or C

driving skills portion and/or or knowledge written portion, pursuant

to subsection A of this section, of the Oklahoma driving

examination. All designated examiners must successfully have

completed the courses and training as outlined in paragraph 2 of

this subsection. Service Oklahoma shall be required to approve at

least one public transit agency that has or maintains a program

instructing students for a Class A, B, or C license to hire or

employ third-party examiners pursuant to this section. It shall be

permissible for any public transit agency operating in this state to

utilize the third-party examiners hired or employed by a public

transit agency approved by Service Oklahoma.

2. The Department of Public Safety, in conjunction with Service

Oklahoma, shall adopt a curriculum of required courses and training

to be offered to third-party examiners. The courses and training

for certification shall meet the same standards as required for

commercial driver examiners of Service Oklahoma.

3. Service Oklahoma shall require each third-party examiner

applicant and commercial school driver education instructor

Req. No. 3106 Page 22

appl icant to submit to an electronic national criminal history

record check pursuant to Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma

Statutes. On or before December 1, 2022, Service Oklahoma shall

require each third-party examiner or commercial school driver

education instructor to submit to an electronic national criminal

history record check pursuant to Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the

Oklahoma Statutes. The fees for the background check shall be borne

by the third-party examiner, third-party examiner applicant,

commercial school driver education instructor, or commercial school

driver education instructor applicant.

F. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules to:

1. Implement and administer the provisions of this section

based on requirements set forth in 49 C.F.R., Section 383.75 of

Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations;

2. Establish a process to inform any school, public transit

agency, examiner, or state, county, or municipal government agency,

who has been denied, within forty-five (45) days from the denial;

3. Create an appeal process for any school, public transit

agency, examiner, or state, county, or municipal government agency

denied; and

4. If the initial application for approval was denied, limit

the number of times an individual school, public transit agency,

individual examiner applicant, or state, county, or municipal



Req. No. 3106 Page 23

gove rnment agency may reapply in a calendar year to two

reapplications.

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.



60-2-3106 MSBB 12/15/2025 4:50:31 PM







































Req. No. 3106 Page 24